Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5968.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-82-16 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-82 entitled "Farmland
Preservation Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-82-16. Charges for utility extension.
(a) No city, town, quasi-municipal corporation, or public corporation may assess the owner
of an agricultural operation having frontage on a public roadway for the extension of water and
sewer utilities past the property.
(b) No city, town, quasi-municipal corporation or public corporation shall assess the owner
of an agricultural operation as defined in § 2-23-4, or agricultural land as defined in § 42-82-2(1),
in existence as of July 1, 2025 and having frontage on a public roadway for the extension of water
utilities past the property. Assessment for the extension of water utilities includes any impact fee,
connection fee or any other fee designed to circumvent the prohibition contained in this section.
(1) Agricultural operations and agricultural land eligible for the protections of the
exemptions in section (b) of this section, shall be listed as of July 1, 2025 on the division of
agriculture’s list of agricultural operations pursuant to § 2-23.1-3 and shall be in compliance with
the provisions of § 44-27-3.
(b)(c) The owner of the agricultural operation may only be charged for the extension of
sewer utilities if the owner has requested the utility extension. The agricultural operation may tie
into any sewer utility extension made past that property for the normal cost of tie-in and no cost for

the infrastructure improvement except for its base usable charge. The protection afforded by this
section shall be null and void and the assessments made if the owner of the agricultural operation
develops or sells to other than a qualifying agricultural operation the property or farmland within
twenty (20) years of the date the utility extensions were operational.
(d) The owner of the agricultural operation shall not be charged for the extension of water
utilities if the owner has requested the utility extension. The agricultural operation may tie into any
water utility extension made past that property at no cost of tie-in and no cost for the infrastructure
improvement except for its base usable charge. The protection afforded by this section shall be null
and void and the assessments made if the owner of the agricultural operation develops or sells to
other than a qualifying agricultural operation the property or farmland within twenty (20) years of
the date the utility extensions were operational.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001886
========
LC001886 - Page 2 of 3